Arkansas, session 2025, HB1057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-73-103 is amended to read as follows:
5-73-103. Possession of firearms by certain persons.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (d) subsections (d) and (e) of
this section or unless authorized by and subject to such conditions as
prescribed by the Governor, or his or her designee, or the United States
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives, or other a bureau or
office designated by the United States Department of Justice, no person shall
possess or own any a firearm who has been:
(1) Convicted of a felony, with the exception of:
(A) An antitrust violation;
(B) An unfair trade practice;
(C) Restraint of trade; or
(D) Another offense relating to the regulation of business
practices;
*CEB029*
04-02-2025 10:02:16 CEB029

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/18/25 H4/2/25 HB1057
(2) Adjudicated mentally ill; or
(3) Committed involuntarily to any a mental institution.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this
section, a determination by a jury or a court that a person committed a
felony constitutes a conviction for purposes of subsection (a) of this
section even though the court suspended imposition of sentence or placed the
defendant on probation.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply to a
person whose case was dismissed and expunged under § 16-93-301 et seq. or §
16-98-303(g).
(3) The determination by the jury or court that the person
committed a felony does not constitute a conviction for purposes of
subsection (a) of this section if the person is subsequently granted a pardon
explicitly restoring the ability to possess a firearm.
(c)(1) A person who violates this section commits a Class B felony if:
(A) The person has a prior violent felony conviction;
(B) The person's current possession of a firearm involves
the commission of another crime;
(C) The person has a prior felony conviction for an
offense that had as an element of the offense the use or possession of a
deadly weapon; or
(D) The person has been previously convicted under this
section or a similar provision from another jurisdiction.
(2) A person who violates this section commits a Class D felony
if he or she has been previously convicted of a felony and his or her present
conduct or the prior felony conviction does not fall within subdivision
(c)(1) of this section.
(3) Otherwise, the person commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) The Governor may restore without granting a pardon the right of a
convicted felon or an adjudicated delinquent to own and possess to own,
possess, ship, receive, and transport a firearm upon the recommendation of
the chief law enforcement officer in the jurisdiction in which the person
resides, so long as the underlying felony or delinquency adjudication:
(1) Did not involve the use of a weapon; and
(2) Occurred more than eight (8) years ago.
(e) As used in this section, “felony” means any state or federal
04-02-2025 10:02:16 CEB029

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/18/25 H4/2/25 HB1057
felony, excluding a federal or state felony offense for which the person
convicted has completed his or her sentence and pertaining to:
(1) An antitrust violation;
(2) An unfair trade practice;
(3) Restraint of trade; or
(4) Another offense relating to the regulation of business
practices. The right of a convicted felon to own, possess, ship, receive,
and transport a firearm shall be restored upon a petition to a circuit court
if the following conditions are met:
(1) The underlying felony was not:
(A) A serious felony involving violence as defined in § 5-
4-501(c)(2);
(B) A felony involving violence as defined in § 5-4-
501(d)(2); or
(C) A felony listed below or contained in the following
chapters or subchapters:
(i) Homicide, § 5-10-101 et seq.;
(ii) Kidnapping and related offenses, § 5-11-101 et
seq.;
(iii) Robbery, § 5-12-101 et seq.;
(iv) Assault and battery, § 5-13-101 et seq.;
(v) Sexual offenses, § 5-14-101 et seq.;
(vi) Voyeurism offenses, § 5-16-101 et seq.;
(vii) Death threats, § 5-17-101 et seq.;
(viii) The Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101
et seq.;
(ix) Domestic battering and assault, § 5-26-301 et
seq.;
(x) Custody and visitation, § 5-26-501 et seq.;
(xi) Exposing a child to a chemical substance or
methamphetamine, § 5-27-230;
(xii) The Arkansas Protection of Children Against
Exploitation Act of 1979, § 5-27-301 et seq.;
(xiii) Use of children in sexual performances, § 5-
27-401 et seq.;
(xiv) Computer crimes against minors, § 5-27-601 et
04-02-2025 10:02:16 CEB029

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/18/25 H4/2/25 HB1057
seq.;
(xv) Abuse of adults, § 5-28-101 et seq.;
(xvi) The Vulnerable Person Protection Act, § 5-29-
201 et seq.;
(xvii) Damage or destruction of property, § 5-38-101
et seq.;
(xviii) Causing a catastrophe, § 5-38-202;
(xix) Arson, § 5-38-301;
(xx) Residential burglary, § 5-39-201, breaking or
entering, § 5-39-202, and operating a chop shop — dealing in stolen or forged
motor vehicle parts, § 5-36-109;
(xxi) Aggravated residential burglary, § 5-39-204;
(xxii) Treason, § 5-51-201;
(xxiii) First degree escape, § 5-54-110, second
degree escape, § 5-54-111, third degree escape, § 5-54-112, and permitting
escape in the first degree, § 5-54-113;
(xxiv) Fleeing, § 5-54-125;
(xxv) Killing or injuring animals used by law
enforcement or search and rescue dogs, § 5-54-126;
(xxvi) Terrorism, § 5-54-201 et seq.;
(xxvii) Animals, § 5-62-101 et seq.;
(xxviii) Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-
101 et seq., sale of drug devices, § 5-64-801 et seq., ephedrine and other
nonprescription drugs, § 5-64-1101 et seq., and anhydrous ammonia, § 5-64-
1301 et seq.;
(xxix) Aggravated riot, § 5-71-202;
(xxx) Stalking, § 5-71-229;
(xxxi) Weapons, § 5-73-101 et seq.;
(xxxii) The Arkansas Criminal Gang, Organization, or
Enterprise Act, § 5-74-101 et seq.;
(xxxiii) A felony that requires a person to register
as a sex offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-
901 et seq.;
(xxxiv) An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
commit any of the felonies listed in subdivisions (d)(1) of this section, if
the attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy itself is a felony; or
04-02-2025 10:02:16 CEB029

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/18/25 H4/2/25 HB1057
(xxxv) A felony traffic offense committed in a motor
vehicle if the person was a holder of a commercial learner's permit or a
commercial driver's license at the time the felony traffic offense was
committed;
(2)(A) The convicted felon completed his or her sentence for the
underlying felony, including without limitation the full payment of fines,
court costs, and restitution and any other terms or conditions of the
sentence, no less than ten (10) years ago.
(B)(i) The ten-year period of subdivision (e)(2)(A) of
this section shall be calculated from the date in which all terms of the
sentence for a felony other than an offense listed as an exception under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section were completed.
(ii) If the convicted felon has more than one (1)
felony conviction, the ten-year period of subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall be calculated from the latest date in which all terms of a
sentence for a felony other than an offense that is listed as an exception
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section were completed; and
(3) The convicted felon has not had a felony conviction in
another state.
(f)(1) A person who is eligible to have his or her firearms rights
restored under subsection (e) of this section may file a uniform petition in
the circuit court of the county in which he or she resides.
(2) Within fifteen (15) business days after the uniform petition
is filed, the court shall:
(A) Grant or deny the uniform petition;
(B) Notify the petitioner by mail of the court's decision;
(C) If the petition is granted, notify the Arkansas Crime
Information Center of the restoration of firearms rights.
(g) The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall:
(1) Adopt and provide the following to be used by a petitioner
and any circuit court in this state:
(A) A uniform petition for restoration of firearms rights;
and
(B) A uniform order to restore firearms rights; and
(2) After receiving the notification required under (f)(2)(C) of
this section, notify the National Crime Information Center or its successor
04-02-2025 10:02:16 CEB029

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/18/25 H4/2/25 HB1057
of the restoration of firearms rights.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-73-309(5), concerning the circumstances
in which the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall issue a
license to carry a concealed handgun, is amended to read as follows:
(5) Has not been convicted of a felony in a court of this state,
of any other state, or of the United States unless:
(A) The applicant is subsequently granted a pardon by the
Governor or the President of the United States explicitly restoring his or
her ability to possess a firearm;
(B) The applicant was sentenced prior to March 13, 1995,
and the record of conviction has been sealed or expunged under Arkansas law;
or
(C) The applicant's offense was dismissed and sealed or
expunged under § 16-93-301 et seq. or § 16-98-303(g);
(D) The applicant's felony conviction was for an offense
that is listed as an exception under § 5-73-103(a)(1); or
(E) The applicant's ability to possess a firearm is
subsequently restored under § 5-73-103(d) or § 5-73-103(e);


/s/R. Scott Richardson














04-02-2025 10:02:16 CEB029